Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1158.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 1, 1974 (P.L.90, No.24), known as the Pennsylvania Pesticide Control Act of 1973, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 27.1. Prohibited Pesticides.--(a) It shall be unlawful to use, or cause the use of, paraquat as a pesticide in this Commonwealth.(b) As used in this section:"CAS number" means the unique accession number assigned by the Chemical Abstracts Service, a division of the American Chemical Society, as of the effective date of this section, to a 12345678910111213141516171819 substance."Paraquat" means the chemical with CAS number 4685-14-7 and any salt of that chemical, including methyl viologen (CAS number 1910-42-5) and paraquat bismethylsulfate (CAS number 2074-50-2).Section 2. All regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in one year.20260SB1158PN1457 - 2 - 1234567